ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Alpinism > Îmbrăcăminte și accesorii pentru alpinism: Ochelari pentru asigurare; Perii pentru alpinism; Mănuși pentru alpinism; Căști pentru alpinism; Jachete pentru alpinism; Genunchiere pentru alpinism; Pantaloni de cățărare; Pantofi pentru alpinism; Bandă de alpinism; Crampoane
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Escalada > Acessórios e vestuário de escalada: Óculos para dar segurança; Escovas de escalada; Luvas de escalada; Capacetes de escalada; Casacos de escalada; Joelheiras de escalada; Calças de escalada; Calçado de escalada; Fita adesiva de escalada; Crampons
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Klimmen > Klimkleding en -accessoires: Zekeringsbrillen; Klimborstels; Klimhandschoenen; Klimhelmen; Klimjassen; Kniebeschermers voor klimmen; Klimbroeken; Klimschoenen; Klimtape; Klimijzers
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Катерене > Облекло и аксесоари за алпинизъм: Очила за осигуряване; Четки за катерене; Ръкавици за алпинизъм; Каски за алпинизъм; Якета за катерене; Наколенки за катерене; Тигани за къмпинг; Обувки за алпинизъм; Лента за катерене; Котки за катерене
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Kiipeily > Kiipeilyvaatteet ja -tarvikkeet: Varmistuslasit; Kiipeilyharjat; Kiipeilyhanskat; Kiipeilykypärät; Kiipeilytakit; Kiipeilypolvisuojat; Kiipeilyhousut; Kiipeilykengät; Kiipeilyteippi; Jääraudat
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Wspinaczka > Odzież i akcesoria do wspinaczki: Okulary do asekuracji; Szczotki wspinaczkowe; Rękawice wspinaczkowe; Kaski wspinaczkowe; Kurtki wspinaczkowe; Ochraniacze na kolana do wspinaczki; Spodnie wspinaczkowe; Buty do wspinaczki; Tejpy wspinaczkowe; Raki
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Escalada > Equipos y accesorios para escalada: Gafas de aseguramiento; Cepillos de escalada; Guantes para escalada; Cascos de escalada; Chaquetas de escalada; Rodilleras de escalada; Pantalones de escalada; Calzado para escalar; Cinta de escalada; Crampones
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Escalade > Équipement et accessoires d'escalade: Lunettes d’assurage; Brosses d’escalade; Gants d'escalade; Casques d'escalade; Vestes d’escalade; Genouillères d’escalade; Pantalons d’escalade; Chaussons d’escalade; Strap d’escalade; Crampons
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plezanje > Oblačila in dodatki za plezanje: Varovalna očala; Krtače za plezanje; Plezalne rokavice; Plezalne čelade; Jopiči za plezanje; Plezalni ščitniki za kolena; Hlače za plezanje; Plezalni čevlji; Plezalni trak; Dereze
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Klättring > Klätterkläder och -utrustning: Säkringsglasögon; Klätterborstar; Klätterhandskar; Klätterhjälmar; Klätterjackor; Knäskydd för klättring; Klätterbyxor; Klätterskor; Klättertejp; Stegjärn
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Alpinismo > Roupas e acessórios para escalada: Óculos para dar segurança (belay); Escovas de escalada; Luvas de escalada; Capacetes para alpinismo; Jaquetas de escalada; Joelheiras de escalada; Calças de escalada; Sapatilhas de escalada; Fitas de escalada; Crampons
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Arrampicata > Accessori e attrezzature per arrampicata: Occhiali da sicura; Spazzolini da arrampicata; Guanti per arrampicata; Elmetti da arrampicata; Giacche da arrampicata; Ginocchiere da arrampicata; Pantaloni da arrampicata; Scarpe da arrampicata; Nastro da arrampicata; Ramponi
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Klatring > Udstyr og tilbehør til klatring: Sikringsbriller; Børster til klatring; Klatrehandsker; Klatrehjelme; Klatrejakker; Knæbeskyttere til klatring; Klatrebukser; Klatresko; Klatretape; Klatrejern
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 攀岩用品 > 攀岩服饰与配件: 保护眼镜; 攀岩刷; 攀岩手套; 攀岩头盔; 攀岩外套; 攀岩护膝; 攀岩裤; 攀岩鞋; 攀岩胶带; 攀岩用鞋底钉
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > ปีนเขา > เสื้อผ้าและอุปกรณ์ปีนเขา: แว่นตาบีเลย์; แปรงปัดหน้าผา; ถุงมือปีนเขา; หมวกปีนเขา; เสื้อแจ็คเก็ตปีนหน้าผา; สนับเข่าปีนหน้าผา; กางเกงปีนหน้าผา; รองเท้าปีนเขา; เทปพันนิ้วปีนหน้าผา; ตะปูยึดปลายแหลม
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Horolezectvo > Horolezecké oblečenie a doplnky: Ochranné okuliare; Lezecké kefy; Horolezecké rukavice; Horolezecké prilby; Horolezecká bunda; Chrániče kolien na lezenie; Horolezecké nohavice; Horolezecká obuv; Horolezecká páska; Mačky
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 攀爬運動 > 爬山服飾和配件: 確保眼鏡; 攀岩刷; 攀登手套; 攀岩頭盔; 攀岩外套; 攀岩護膝; 攀岩褲; 攀岩鞋; 攀岩膠帶; 冰爪鞋套
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Tırmanış > Tırmanma Kıyafetleri ve Aksesuarları: Emniyetçi gözlükleri; Tırmanış fırçaları; Tırmanma Eldivenleri; Tırmanma Kaskları; Tırmanış ceketleri; Tırmanış dizlikleri; Tırmanış pantolonları; Tırmanma Ayakkabıları; Tırmanış bantları; Kramponlar
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Mászás > Hegymászó ruházat és kiegészítők: Biztosítószemüvegek; Mászókefék; Hegymászó kesztyűk; Hegymászó sisakok; Mászókabátok; Mászó térdvédők; Mászónadrágok; Hegymászó cipők; Mászó bandázsszalagok; Hómacskák
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Klatring > Klatreklær og tilbehør: Sikringsbriller; Klatrebørster; Klatrehansker; Klatrehjelmer; Klatrejakker; Knebeskyttere til klatring; Klatrebukser; Klatresko; Klatreteip; Crampons
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Скалолазание > Одежда, обувь и аксессуары для скалолазания: Очки для страховки; Щетки для зацепов; Перчатки для скалолазания; Каски для скалолазания; Куртки для скалолазания и альпинизма; Наколенники для скалолазания; Брюки для скалолазания; Обувь для скалолазания; Тейпы для скалолазания; Кошки
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Leo núi > Trang phục leo núi và phụ kiện: Kính hỗ trợ người đỡ; Bàn chải leo núi; Găng tay leo núi; Mũ leo núi; Áo khoác leo núi; Bó gối leo núi; Quần leo núi; Giày leo núi; Băng keo leo núi; Móng sắt leo núi
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Climbing > Climbing Apparel & Accessories: Belay Glasses; Climbing Brushes; Climbing Gloves; Climbing Helmets; Climbing Jackets; Climbing Knee Pads; Climbing Pants; Climbing Shoes; Climbing Tape; Crampons
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Klettern > Kletterbekleidung & -zubehör: Sicherungsbrillen; Kletterbürsten; Kletterhandschuhe; Kletterhelme; Kletterjacken; Kletter-Knieschoner; Kletterhosen; Kletterschuhe; Klettertape; Steigeisen
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Αναρρίχηση > Ένδυση & αξεσουάρ αναρρίχησης: Γυαλιά ασφάλισης (αναρρίχησης); Βουρτσάκια αναρρίχησης; Γάντια αναρρίχησης; Κράνη αναρρίχησης; Τζάκετ αναρρίχησης; Επιγονατίδες αναρρίχησης; Παντελόνια αναρρίχησης; Παπούτσια αναρρίχησης; Ταινίες αναρρίχησης; Καρφιά/αρπάγες
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > クライミング > 登山用装備・小物: ビレイグラス; クライミングブラシ; 登山用グローブ; 登山用ヘルメット; クライミングジャケット; クライミング用ニーパッド; クライミングパンツ; 登山靴; クライミングテープ; アイゼン
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 등반 > 등산복/등산용 액세서리: 빌레이 안경; 클라이밍 브러시; 등산 장갑; 등산용 헬멧; 클라이밍 재킷; 클라이밍 무릎 패드; 클라이밍 팬츠; 등반화; 클라이밍 테이프; 아이젠
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lezectví > Horolezecké oblečení a vybavení: Jistící brýle; Horolezecké kartáčky; Horolezecké rukavice; Lezecké helmy; Horolezecké bundy; Horolezecké nákoleníky; Horolezecké kalhoty; Lezecké boty; Horolezecké pásky; Mačky
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Penjanje > Odjeća i dodaci za penjanje: Naočale za osiguranje; Četke za penjanje; Rukavice za penjanje; Kacige za penjanje; Jakne za planinarenje; Štitnici za koljena za penjanje; Hlače za penjanje; Cipele za penjanje; Traka za penjanje; Dereze
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Laipiojimas > Laipiojimo drabužiai ir aksesuarai: Apsauginiai laipiojimo akiniai; Laipiojimo šepečiai; Laipiojimo pirštinės; Laipiojimo šalmai; Laipiojimo striukės; Laipiojimo kelių apsaugos; Laipiojimo kelnės; Laipiojimo bateliai; Laipiojimo juosta; Katės